Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

State Board of Examiners

62-2-201. Board of examiners — Composition — Terms of members.

There is created a state board of examiners for architects and engineers, called the board in this part and parts 3-8 of this chapter.

The board shall include, where possible, at least one (1) female and at least one (1) member of a racial minority.

This board shall consist of eight (8) members to be appointed by the governor, three (3) to be registered architects who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested architect groups including, but not limited to, the representative professional architects of the state, three (3) to be registered engineers who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested engineering groups including, but not limited to, the representative professional engineering society of the state, one (1) to be a registered landscape architect who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested landscape architect groups including, but not limited to, the representative professional landscape architecture society of the state, and one (1) to be a registered interior designer who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested interior design groups including, but not limited to, the representative professional interior design society of the state. The governor shall consult with interested statewide architect, engineering, landscape architect, and interior design groups including, but not limited to, the professional societies listed in this subdivision (a)(3) to determine qualified persons to fill the positions. This subdivision (a)(3) shall not apply to the appointment of the public member of the board.

In the event of a vacancy on the board for any reason and the governor failing to appoint a successor within three (3) months after the vacancy occurs, the board is empowered to fill that vacancy from the lists of qualified persons submitted by the interested groups, including, but not limited to, the respective societies, until the governor makes an appointment as provided in subdivision (a)(3).

Two (2) of the members, one (1) a registered architect and one (1) a registered engineer, shall be appointed from each grand division of the state, to serve for a period of four (4) years. The successor of any member shall be appointed from the grand division of that member. The member who is a registered landscape architect shall be appointed to serve for a period of four (4) years; provided, that the successor of that member shall be appointed from a grand division different from that member's predecessor. The member who is a registered interior designer shall be appointed to serve for a period of four (4) years.

Appointments to the board shall be in such manner that the terms of members in the same profession shall expire at different times.

Terms of office begin on July 1 of the year of appointment, except that successors may at any time qualify and serve for the remainder of the given term.

In addition to members serving on the board under the authority of subsection (a), the board of architects and engineers shall also include one (1) member who is not engaged in the practice of architecture, engineering or landscape architecture. That member shall be a resident of the state and shall possess good moral character. The member shall be appointed by the governor, shall serve for a period of four (4) years and, except as provided in § 62-2-302, shall be a full member of the board relative to all board matters.

In addition to members serving on the board under the authority of subsections (a) and (b), the board shall also include as associate members three (3) registered engineers, who may be appointed by the governor from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested engineering groups, including, but not limited to, the representative professional engineering society of the state. The governor shall consult with such interested engineering groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions.

An associate engineer member shall be appointed from each grand division, to serve for a period of four (4) years; provided, that the first two (2) members appointed under this subsection (c) shall serve for periods of one (1) and two (2) years, respectively. The successor of any associate engineer member shall be appointed from the grand division of the member.

Appointments to the board under this subsection (c) shall be in a manner that the terms of the associate engineer members shall expire at different times.

Terms of office begin on July 1 of the year of appointment, except that successors may at any time qualify and serve for the remainder of the given term.

Associate engineer board members appointed under this subsection (c) shall be subject to § 62-2-202.

Associate engineer members approved under this subsection (c) shall assist the board with routine matters and responsibilities as requested by the board. Associate engineer members shall attend board meetings, committee meetings and other board functions only as required by the board. The associate engineer members shall have no voting privileges and are not to be considered as members for quorum or election purposes.

Associate engineer members shall render technical assistance to the board and staff as authorized by the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-202; Acts 1988, ch. 990, §§ 10, 11; 1991, ch. 164, §§ 11-13; 1992, ch. 582, § 1; 1995, ch. 198, § 1; 1997, ch. 33, §§ 4, 5; 2012, ch. 724, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 610, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The board of examiners for architects and engineers, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-247.

The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration, see §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 26 provided that the requirement of a person to register to obtain a certificate of registration to use the title “interior designer” shall not take effect until January 1, 1994.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Attorney General Opinions. Definition and use of the term “engineer”, OAG 07-100, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (7/9/07).

62-2-202. Qualifications of board members — Removal — Vacancies.

The members of the board appointed under § 62-2-201(a) shall each have had at least ten (10) years’ experience in the practice of architecture as a registered architect, ten (10) years’ experience in the practice of engineering as a registered engineer, ten (10) years’ experience in the practice of interior design as a registered interior designer or ten (10) years’ experience in the practice of landscape architecture as a registered landscape architect, with no record of any formal disciplinary action. Such members shall each have been in responsible charge of work for at least five (5) years, and shall each have demonstrated an interest in improving the profession by involvement in a statewide association directly related to their profession for at least five (5) years. Each member shall be a citizen of the United States and shall have been a resident of Tennessee for five (5) years at the time of appointment. The ten-year requirement of experience as a registered practitioner shall not apply to the registered interior designer member until January 1, 2014; provided, however, that the member shall have been a registered interior designer for five (5) years and shall have ten (10) years’ experience as an interior designer.

The governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incapacity, or neglect of duty.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the board.

The chair of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (b)(2)(A).

Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the unexpired term as prescribed in § 62-2-201.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-203; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 12; 1991, ch. 164, §§ 14, 15; 1992, ch. 582, § 2; 1997, ch. 33, § 6; 2005, ch. 9, § 1; 2012, ch. 724, § 5; 2016, ch. 610, § 4.

62-2-203. Certificates of appointment — Legal assistance — Attendance of witnesses — Seal — Rules — Continuing professional education.

Each member appointed under § 62-2-201(a) shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor, and no one shall be eligible for appointment who does not at the time hold an unexpired certificate to practice architecture, engineering or landscape architecture or certificate of registration to use the title “registered interior designer,” except the first registered interior designer board member, issued under this chapter or other applicable law. Before beginning a term of office, each appointed member shall file with the secretary of state the oath of office.

The board or any committee of the board shall be entitled to the services of an assistant attorney general in connection with the affairs of the board, and the board shall have power to compel the attendance of witnesses on behalf of the state or any party having issue before the board, may administer oaths and may take testimony concerning all matters within its jurisdiction.

The board shall adopt and have an official seal, which shall be affixed to all certificates of registration granted, and shall make all bylaws and rules not inconsistent with the law.

The board has the authority to establish continuing professional education requirements for architects, engineers, landscape architects and registered interior designers. Any rules promulgated to effect this subsection (d) shall be promulgated in compliance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-204; Acts 1988, ch. 990, § 13; 1991, ch. 164, § 16; 1995, ch. 129, § 1; 1997, ch. 33, § 7.

62-2-204. Board meetings — Officers — Quorum.

The board shall hold at least two (2) regular meetings each year. Special meetings shall be held at times that the bylaws of the board may provide. Notice of all meetings shall be given in the manner that the bylaws of the board may provide, consistent with all existing state laws.

The board shall elect annually from its members a chair, a vice chair and a secretary.

A quorum of the board shall consist of no less than five (5) members; except, however, for the purpose of formal disciplinary matters involving an architect, engineer, registered interior designer or landscape architect, at least one (1) board member from the respective profession shall be present.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 5; T.C.A., § 62-205; Acts 1982, ch. 735, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 676, § 6; 1988, ch. 990, § 14; 1990, ch. 1026, § 20; 1991, ch. 164, § 17; 1997, ch. 33, § 8.

Cross-References. Per diem and travel expenses of members, § 56-1-307.

62-2-205. Executive director.

The board shall have an executive director who shall perform all administrative functions for the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 6; T.C.A., § 62-206; Acts 1995, ch. 197, § 1.

62-2-206. Attendance at state, regional and national registration meetings.

The board may authorize, subject to the approval of the department of commerce and insurance, one (1) administrative person and three (3) board members to attend state, regional and national registration meetings and to perform other necessary functions. These personnel shall be reimbursed for all travel and other necessary expenses, which shall be claimed and paid in accordance with the prevailing travel regulations of state government.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 7; T.C.A., § 62-207; Acts 2000, ch. 817, § 1.

62-2-207. Records of board — Roster of registrants — Annual report.

The board shall keep a record of its proceedings and a register of all applicants for registration showing, for each, the date of application, name, age, educational and other qualifications, place of business and place of residence, whether or not an examination was required and whether the applicant was rejected or a certificate of registration granted and the date of such action. The books and register of the board shall be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded in the books and register.

A roster showing the names and places of business and of residence of all registered architects, engineers, landscape architects and registered interior designers and the names and addresses of all firms, corporations and partnerships practicing architecture, engineering or landscape architecture or using the title “registered interior designer” in this state may be printed annually.

The board shall submit reports to the governor as required by state regulations. A copy of these reports shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-208; Acts 1997, ch. 128, § 1; 2001, ch. 261, § 1.

Cross-References. Regulations governing reports, § 4-4-114.